Utah statutes.
36-1-201.   Utah House of Representatives -- District boundaries.

(1)  The Utah House of Representatives shall consist of 75 members, with one member to be elected from each Utah House of Representatives district.

(2) (a)  The Legislature adopts the official census population figures and maps of the Bureau of the Census of the United States Department of Commerce developed in connection with the taking of the 2000 national decennial census as the official data for establishing House district boundaries.

(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), the numbers and boundaries of the House districts are designated and established by the maps attached to the bill that enacts this section.

(3)  Because of the new county boundary separating Salt Lake County and Utah County, the boundary separating House District 51 and House District 27 that follows the old county boundary is changed to follow the new county boundary.

